Maryland, session 2026, HB0234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
2–405.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall develop a pay plan for police employees, State
Police communications operators, and State Police communications supervisors that
includes the ranks and the grades within ranks that the Secretary considers appropriate.
(2) The pay plan under this subsection:
(i) is subject to approval by the Secretary of Budget and
Management; and
(ii) is effective on approval by the Governor only to the extent that
sufficient money is included in the State budget.
(b) Each police employee, State Police communications operator, and State Police
communications supervisor is entitled to receive the pay rate, including any increment
based on length of service, set forth in the pay plan established under subsection (a) of this
section.
(c) (1) Each police employee is entitled to the pay rate for the next highest step
within the police employee’s rank on:
– 1 –

Ch. 133 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) each July 1, if the police employee was a police employee on July
1, 1967; or
(ii) each anniversary of the date of employment, for all other police
employees.
(2) [(i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, on]
ON promotion a police employee or a deputy State fire marshal is entitled to the pay
specified for the new rank in the same step that the police employee or deputy State fire
marshal occupied before promotion.
[(ii) If the step that the police employee or deputy State fire marshal
occupied before promotion is higher than that held by a police employee or deputy State
fire marshal who is already in the rank and has equal or higher total service time, on
promotion the police employee or deputy State fire marshal is entitled only to the pay
specified for the new rank in the next lower step than the police employee or deputy State
fire marshal occupied before promotion.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –